Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB32.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 154.12-330 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Economic Development Finance Authority is hereby authorized to
develop and fund a small business loan program to assist new or existing small
businesses operating in the Commonwealth. The authority may lend up to one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) to any eligible small business for acquisition,
construction, expansion, working capital, or any other business expense the
authority deems reasonable to approve.
(2) The authority shall determine the terms, conditions, and requirements for loans
issued under this section, including collateral requirements when deemed
reasonable and appropriate. Recognizing that small businesses, while essential for
the economic vitality of the Commonwealth, may have difficulty obtaining
conventional loans, the authority may provide terms that are more lenient, high-risk,
less secure, or otherwise less stringent than industry standards.
(3) To be eligible for a loan under this section, a small business shall be engaged in
manufacturing, agribusiness, or service or technology, shall not be engaged
primarily in retail, and shall commit to creating and maintaining at least one (1)
new full-time job above the number existing on the date of application.
(4) The authority shall develop criteria to evaluate loan applications that give
investment preference to businesses that:
(a) Employ veterans at a rate of no less than twenty-five percent (25%) of the
business's total number of employees; or
(b) Are veteran-owned businesses, as defined in KRS 14A.1-070.
The authority shall use these criteria to make all reasonable efforts to direct at
least seven percent (7%) of loaned funds each year to these businesses, provided
that the authority receives qualified applications from these businesses that
Page 1 of 11
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 958
request at least seven percent (7%) of the total funds budgeted to be loaned each
year.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 151B IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Office of the Kentucky Center for Statistics shall produce a monthly
electronic report that shall:
(a) Include workforce need projections which are organized by industry, major
occupational group, geographic region, and necessary credentials or
training;
(b) Compare those workforce need projections with existing and projected
workforce availability as well as the availability of necessary credentials in
the Commonwealth;
(c) Highlight in-demand industries, occupational groups, and credentials by
geographic region; and
(d) Include a list of which in-demand jobs and credentials would leverage the
skills, experience, and credentials possessed by veterans.
(2) The office shall, at least once per month, forward this report, underlying data,
and any additional relevant information to:
(a) The Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs;
(b) Military outplacement offices;
(c) Vocational education centers; and
(d) Nonprofit programs which connect veterans to jobs.
SECTION 3. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
154 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs shall annually review
apprenticeship, training, and other in-state vocational programs focused on
providing job training and placement to returning veterans. This annual review
Page 2 of 11
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 958
shall compare the costs and outcomes of the reviewed programs.
(2) The commission shall use the results of the annual review to develop a series of
recommendations on how to utilize state funding to expand those programs which
receive the most favorable evaluations. The commission shall include an
estimation of the future returns and improved outcomes from proposed program
expansions to the Commonwealth.
(3) The commission shall provide an annual report describing its recommendations
from subsection (2) of this section to the Legislative Research Commission for
referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public
Protection, the Interim Joint Committee on Licensing, Occupations, and
Administrative Regulations, and the Interim Joint Committee on Economic
Development and Workforce Investment, and to the Office of the Governor to
assist those entities in making annual budget decisions prior to November 1 of
each year for five (5) years after the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 4. A NEW SECTION OF SUBCHAPTER 12 OF KRS CHAPTER
154 IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Commission on Military Affairs is directed to review all state
occupational licenses for which military members may have relevant training or
experience and to produce a report recommending steps that can be taken to
increase the recognition of military training and experience towards in-state
licensing within one (1) year from the effective date of this Act.
(2) The commission shall thereafter:
(a) Take any steps identified in the report that can be taken without further
legislation as soon as practicable and not later than one (1) year after
issuance of the report; and
(b) Report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim
Joint Committee on Licensing, Occupations, and Administrative
Page 3 of 11
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 958
Regulations and the Interim Joint Committee on Veterans, Military Affairs,
and Public Protection annually to request that those entities consider any
necessary legislation.
SECTION 5. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 311 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Medical Licensure shall review all licensing practices
and take all necessary and appropriate steps to increase recognition of military
training and experience toward in-state licensing of nurses and physician
assistants through the promulgation of administrative regulations.
(2) The board shall report to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the
Interim Joint Committee on Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Protection and
the Interim Joint Committee on Licensing, Occupations, and Administrative
Regulations within one (1) year of the effective date of this Act any additional
steps that would require legislation and request that those entities consider any
necessary legislation.
SECTION 6. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) Any veteran who enrolls as a student in good standing at a public postsecondary
education institution shall, upon application for academic credit, be granted
academic credit towards his or her degree for the completion of courses that were
part of that veteran's military training or service if the completed courses meet
the standards of all appropriate discipline-specific accrediting bodies and
institutional accrediting agencies as recognized by the United States Department
of Education.
(2) No fee, tuition, or other charge shall be assessed against a veteran for academic
credit granted pursuant to this section.
(3) The governing boards of all public postsecondary education institutions shall
Page 4 of 11
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 958
adopt procedures necessary to fully implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 7. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 164 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The governing boards of all public institutions shall adopt rules and procedures to:
(1) Include veterans and National Guard members in any early course registration
period, if the institution offers an early course registration period to any segment
of the student population;
(2) Award full academic credit to a student who is called to active duty in the Armed
Forces of the United States for a course if at the time the student is called to
active duty:
(a) The student has completed at least eighty-five (85%) of the coursework
contributing to the final grade in the course, including but not limited to
exams and classroom attendance, if applicable; and
(b) Has a passing grade;
(3) Refund a portion of tuition and fees to a student who is called to active duty and
does not meet the requirements of subsection (2) of this section for academic
credit to be awarded, that portion being determined by taking the total amount of
tuition and fees paid by the student for the current academic term and
multiplying that total amount by the percentage of academic credits for which the
student is enrolled in the current term for which the student is not eligible to
receive academic credit under subsection (2) of this section; and
(4) Permit all veterans and any National Guard member who is returning from active
duty to do the following without incurring late fees or other penalties:
(a) File an application for admission at any time prior to the first day of classes
of the semester for which the applicant is seeking admission;
(b) Once an application has been filled but before the institution has issued a
determination on admission, register for available courses and permit the
Page 5 of 11
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 958
applicant to attend courses provisionally; and
(c) If an applicant is not registered for classes upon admission to the
institution, register for available courses prior to the registration deadline.
Section 8. KRS 40.317 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Veterans' Affairs shall employ [no more than five (5)
]veterans' benefits regional administrators and [no fewer than twenty (20) ]veterans'
benefits field representatives.
(a)[(1)] The duties of a veterans' benefits regional administrator shall include but
not be limited to supervision of veterans' benefits field representatives in an
assigned region.
(b)[(2)] The duties of a veterans' benefits field representative shall include but
not be limited to providing assistance to veterans and their dependents with
initiation, preparation, documentation, and adjudication of claims to benefits
under federal, state, or local laws.
(2) The department shall, whenever feasible, select and train veterans' benefits field
representatives and veterans' benefits regional administrators who have direct
knowledge of the veteran communities they serve.
(3) Veterans' benefits field representatives shall help identify all federal and other
health benefits, coverage, and services available to veterans and their families.
(4) Veterans' benefits field representatives shall coordinate with relevant
departments, health care providers, and health insurance programs to help
veterans and their beneficiaries apply for coverage under available programs,
including helping veterans overcome barriers within the health care system to
ensure enrollment in health plans and effective delivery and coordination of
health services.
(5) Initiatives by veterans' benefits field representatives shall, whenever feasible,
leverage existing resources and structures where veterans and their families are
Page 6 of 11
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 958
likely to be found.
SECTION 9. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 40 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Veterans' Affairs shall examine all existing
programs designed to increase access to affordable quality health care by using
the veterans' benefits field representatives described in Section 8 of this Act as a
source of information about the unique needs and coverage and treatment gaps
faced by veterans and their families in order to evaluate if the needs of veterans
and their families are met by those programs or whether further coordination
with the veterans' benefits field representatives or other programs or initiatives
would better meet those needs.
(2) The department shall, upon completing any steps identified in subsection (1) of
this section, produce a report of its findings, recommendations, and any
additional legislative or budgetary action it recommends and deliver the report to
the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee
on Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public Protection, the Interim Joint Committee
on Health Services, and the Interim Joint Committee on Families and Children,
and to the Office of the Governor, and shall make the report freely available to
the public.
(3) The department shall prepare a report showing the impacts that Medicaid
expansion under 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396a and other relevant federal law has had to
date for veterans and their families in Kentucky. The report shall include any
recommendations for better including or serving veterans and their families in
that expansion. The department shall deliver that report to the Legislative
Research Commission for referral to the Interim Joint Committee on Veterans,
Military Affairs, and Public Protection, the Interim Joint Committee on Families
and Children, and the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services, and to the
Page 7 of 11
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 958
Office of the Governor, and shall make the report freely available to the public.
SECTION 10. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 40 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) The Kentucky Department of Veterans' Affairs shall ensure that veterans and
their families have access to mental health treatment, including for post-
traumatic stress disorder, depression, suicide, and suicidal ideation.
(a) The department shall make mental health coverage services and treatment a
full focus stream of the veterans' benefits field representative program
described in Section 8 of this Act, and ensure that veterans' benefit field
representatives help identify all federal and other mental health benefits,
coverage, and services available to veterans and their families, including for
post-traumatic stress disorder, depression, and suicide prevention.
(b) The department shall develop and implement a strategy to reduce barriers to
access to mental health services and treatment for veterans and their
families in coordination with local, state, and federal governmental
agencies and in consultation with nonprofits, service providers including
Veterans Affairs medical centers and the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs, and localities and cities that have effective prevention and
treatment systems for mental health, including by:
1. Identifying structural and logistical barriers to accessing treatment,
including perceived stigma, long travel distances to receive care, and
any other barriers, and sending an annual report on such barriers
available to the Legislative Research Commission for referral to the
Interim Joint Committee on Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public
Protection, the Interim Joint Committee on Families and Children,
and the Interim Joint Committee on Health, and to the Office of the
Governor, and making the report available online;
Page 8 of 11
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 958
2. Resolving all barriers identified in the report required by
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph that can be resolved without
legislative or budgetary action, including through increased
coordination between departments, nonprofit providers, and the
federal government, application for and use of private and federal
grants, and other actions; and
3. Reporting annually to the Legislative Research Commission, the
Interim Joint Committee on Veterans, Military Affairs, and Public
Protection, the Interim Joint Committee on Families and Children,
and the Interim Joint Committee on Health Services, and to the Office
of the Governor, and releasing to the news media any additional
legislative or budgetary steps that would resolve barriers identified in
subparagraph 1. of this paragraph that have not been resolved by the
steps taken under subparagraph 2. of this paragraph.
(c) The department shall enhance and strengthen suicide prevention programs
that are based on best practices identified by experts in the field of mental
health care in coordination with local, state, and federal government
agencies, and in consultation with nonprofits, service providers including
the Veterans Affairs medical centers and the United States Department of
Veterans Affairs, and localities and cities that have effective prevention and
treatment systems for mental health, including by:
1. Identifying and applying for federal and private grants focused on
veteran suicide prevention;
2. Coordinating local, state, federal, and nonprofit programs that include
community-based approaches for at-risk veterans and veterans at
large;
3. Providing technical assistance to communities to develop strategic
Page 9 of 11
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 958
plans to reduce veteran suicide, including through coordination and
participation by local leaders, faith communities, schools, workplaces,
and other stakeholders; and
4. Evaluating community strategic plans within Kentucky and
disseminating learnings and best practices to optimize the impact of
efforts by all partners and stakeholders.
(2) The department shall ensure that resources are available to veterans to assist in
connecting veterans to trained mental health care providers, including those
trained in veteran suicide prevention.
(a) The department shall create a centralized provider database, organized by
region, identifying mental health providers with expertise and ability to
assist veterans and their families which also identifies which mental health
providers have training or expertise in the prevention of veteran suicide and
treatment of veteran suicidal ideation.
(b) The department shall use existing resources and incorporate best practice
and research from the United States Department of Veterans Affairs and
state and nonprofit service providers in Kentucky to develop a continuing
education course for mental health providers in Kentucky to obtain
expertise in veteran suicide assessment, prevention, treatment, and risk
management.
(c) The department shall make the veteran suicide continuing education course
described in paragraph (b) of this subsection available for free to providers
in regions of the Commonwealth identified in paragraph (a) of this
subsection which lack a sufficient number of trained providers.
(d) The department shall use existing or appropriated resources to identify
evidence-based best practices to increase awareness of any veteran suicide
prevention hotline which provides services in-state and other crisis
Page 10 of 11
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:31 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 958
resources with proven effectiveness to reduce veteran suicide.
SECTION 11. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 40 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Kentucky Department of Veterans' Affairs shall create an initiative designed to
end veteran homelessness.
(1) As used in this section, "ending veteran homelessness" has the same meaning as
in the United States Interagency Council on Homelessness Criteria and
Benchmarks for Achieving the Goal of Ending Veteran Homelessness.
(2) The department shall develop and implement a strategy to meet the goal of ending
veteran homelessness within three (3) years of the effective date of this Act in
coordination with local, state, and federal government agencies and nonprofits,
and in consultation with states and cities that have achieved an end to veteran
homelessness in accordance with the criteria described in subsection (1) of this
section, including through:
(a) Coordinated community outreach and a common assessment tool;
(b) A community-wide, comprehensive list of veterans experiencing
homelessness, prioritized based on vulnerability;
(c) Data-sharing among all relevant providers, government agencies, and
Veterans Affairs Medical Centers;
(d) Increased coordination and streamlined processes for appropriate housing
placements;
(e) Connecting veterans experiencing homelessness to health, mental health,
employment, and training resources through the services described in this
section;
(f) A commitment to Housing First principles, as defined by the United States
Interagency Council on Homelessness; and
(g) Identification of and application for funding as needed.
Page 11 of 11
XXXX 12/19/2024 3:31 PM Jacketed